District of Columbia statutes.
11-1568.02

Additional opportunity to make a survivor annuity election.

(1)

Any individual who, on or before the date of the enactment of this Act, has not made an election under section 11-1566(a) of Title 11 of the District of Columbia Official Code, to come within the purview of the survivor annuity provisions of subchapter III of Chapter 15 of such title and is no longer entitled to make such an election may make such an election. Any such election shall be submitted in writing to the Secretary of the Treasury.

(2)

An election under paragraph (1) shall be effective on the day it is received by the official referred to in such paragraph.

June 6, 1986, 100 Stat. 514, Pub. L. 99-335, § 601(d)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2422, Pub. L. 105-274, § 2(e)(2)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-537, Pub. L. 105-277, § 804(e)(2)
Section 23(c) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 11-1568.2 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 11-1568.02.
“The date of the enactment of this Act,” referred to in the first sentence of paragraph (1), is June 6, 1986.
1981 Ed., § 11-1568.2.